Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-103
State banner; use as advertisement or trademark, prohibited.

The state banner, provided for in section 90-102, shall never be used as a business advertisement or trademark, either in its entirety or in a composite; and any insult to such banner is forbidden.

Laws 1925, c. 151, § 3, p. 388;

C.S.1929, § 84-722;

R.S.1943, § 84-715.